Missouri, session 2026, SB1159.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 571, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
two new sections, to be known as sections 571.200 and 571.202,
to read as follows:
571.200. As used in this section and section 571.202,
the following terms mean:
(1) "Law enforcement officer", any individual employed
by the United States or by a state, county, city,
municipality, village, township, or other political
subdivision as a police officer or peace officer or in a
similar position that involves the enforcement of the law
and protection of the public interest;
(2) "Licensed dealer", a person who has a valid
federal firearms dealer license and all additional licenses
required by state or local law to engage in the business of
selling or transferring firearms;
(3) "Person", any individual, corporation, company,
association, firm, partnership, club, organization, society,
joint stock company, or other entity.

SB 1159 2
571.202. 1. No person shall sell or otherwise
transfer a firearm, including through online interactions,
unless:
(1) Such person is a licensed dealer;
(2) The purchaser or transferee is a licensed dealer;
or
(3) The sale or transfer satisfies the requirements of
subsection 2 or 3 of this section.
2. If neither party to a firearms transaction is a
licensed dealer, the parties may have a licensed dealer
facilitate the sale or transfer. A licensed dealer shall
process the sale or other transfer as if the licensed dealer
is the seller or transferor. The licensed dealer shall
comply with all requirements of federal, state, and local
law that would apply if the licensed dealer were the seller
or transferor of the firearm. The licensed dealer shall
conduct a background check on the purchaser or transferee in
accordance with 18 U.S.C. Section 922(t) and other state and
local law and, if the transaction is not prohibited, deliver
the firearm to the purchaser or transferee after all legal
requirements are satisfied. The licensed dealer may require
the purchaser or transferee to:
(1) For administrative costs incurred by the licensed
dealer, pay a fee up to, but not to exceed:
(a) Thirty-five dollars for each transaction involving
the transfer of only one firearm; and
(b) Fifty dollars for each transaction involving the
transfer of multiple firearms; and
(2) Pay other fees pursuant to federal, state, and
local law.
3. A trustee, under the authority of a trust, or a
personal representative, executor, or administrator of an

SB 1159 3
estate shall, before transferring any firearm to an heir or
devisee, have a licensed dealer facilitate the sale or
transfer through the process described under subsection 2 of
this section. If the transaction is prohibited, the heir or
devisee may:
(1) Transfer ownership of the firearm to a specific
individual, provided the transfer to that individual is not
prohibited by the process described under subsection 2 of
this section;
(2) Sell the firearm to a licensed dealer; or
(3) Request that a licensed dealer sell the firearm on
behalf of the heir or devisee and receive the proceeds of
the sale, minus any fee.
4. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, neither the state nor a political subdivision
thereof shall require any licensed dealer to disclose
transactions conducted under the provisions of subsection 2
or 3 of this section. All records shall be maintained by
the licensed dealer in accordance with federal law.
5. The provisions of subsections 1 and 2 of this
section shall not apply to:
(1) Any law enforcement or corrections agency or law
enforcement or corrections officer acting within the course
and scope of his or her employment or official duties;
(2) A United States Marshal, a member of the United
States Armed Forces or the National Guard, or a federal
official transferring or receiving a firearm as required in
the operation of his or her official duties;
(3) A gunsmith who receives a firearm solely for the
purposes of service or repair or the return of the firearm
to its owner by the gunsmith;

SB 1159 4
(4) A common carrier, warehouseman, or other person
engaged in the business of transportation or storage, to the
extent that the receipt of any firearm is in the ordinary
course of business and not for the personal use of any such
person; or
(5) A person who transfers a firearm to a relative who
is related within the first degree by consanguinity or
affinity.
6. A violation of a provision of this section is a
class B misdemeanor. Each day a violation of this section
is committed or continued shall be considered a separate
violation and punished accordingly.
7. In addition to any other penalty or remedy, the
investigating law enforcement agency shall report any
violation of this section committed by a licensed dealer to
the attorney general, who shall report the violation to the
Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives within
the United States Department of Justice.
✓